Utah statutes.
72-6-110.   Supervision and standards of construction for class B and C
roads.
(1)  All construction plans, specifications, and estimates and all
construction work under Section 72-6-108 shall be prepared and performed under
the direct supervision of a registered professional engineer.
(2)  The supervising engineer shall certify to the county legislative body or
the municipal executive that all road construction projects conform to design
and construction standards as currently adopted by the American Association of
State Highway and Transportation officials.
